spanish.lexc
!!!spanish.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols &OUE &IY +1C +2C +3C +V +Sg +Pl +1P +2P +3P +Masculino +Feminino +Infinitivo +PresenteIndicativo +PreteritoImperfecto +PreteritoIndefinido +Futuro +Condicional +SubjuntivoPresente +SubjuntivoImperfecto +SubjuntivoPosesivo +SubjuntivoFuturo +Affirmativo +Gerundio +Participio +Infinitivo ll ch


LEXICON Root

Adj ;
Noun ;
Verb ;


########## LOS ADJETIVOS ######################################################
LEXICON Adj

descoligado Ainf ;
español Ainf ;
difícil Ainf ;
grande Ainf ;
baladí Ainf ;
blanco Ainf ;
feliz Ainf ;
voraz Ainf ;


########## Regular adjectives' rules ############
LEXICON Ainf

+A+Sg:^0 #;
+A+Pl:^s #;


########## LOS NOMBRES ########################################################
LEXICON Noun

alelotipo Ninf ;
banastero Ninf ;
cipera Ninf ;
empollón Ninf ;
empopada Ninf ;
óryx Ninf ;
libro Ninf ;
luz Ninf ;
ñoñez Ninf ;
penetrador Ninf ;
peneuvista Ninf ;
plácet Ninf ;
rigurosidad Ninf ;
quebraza Ninf ;

u+N+Sg:^u #;
u+N+Pl:^úes #;

########## Singular/Plural for regular nous #####
LEXICON Ninf

+N+Sg:^0 #;
+N+Pl:^s #;


########## LOS VERBOS #########################################################
